Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202684-1305.01
Records; employer education program.

(1) The executive director of the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems shall keep a complete record of all members with respect to name, current address, age, contributions, and any other facts as may be necessary in the administration of the State Employees Retirement Act. The information in the records shall be provided by the employer in an accurate and verifiable form, as specified by the executive director. The executive director shall, from time to time, carry out testing procedures pursuant to section 84-1512 to verify the accuracy of such information. For the purpose of obtaining such facts and information, the executive director shall have access to the records of the various state departments and agencies and the holder of the records shall comply with a request by the executive director for access by providing such facts and information to the executive director in a timely manner. A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth certificate shall be prima facie evidence of the age of the person named in the certificate.

(2) The executive director shall develop and implement an employer education program using principles generally accepted by public employee retirement systems so that all employers have the knowledge and information necessary to prepare and file reports as the board requires.

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 69;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 70;

Laws 2000, LB 1192, § 23;

Laws 2005, LB 503, § 14;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 44.
July 18, 2026